Florida, session 2026, SB256.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âEffective October 1, 2026, subsection (4) of 37 section 790.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 38 790.25âLawful ownership, possession, and use of firearms 39 and other weapons.â 40 (4)âPOSSESSION IN PRIVATE CONVEYANCE.â 41 (a)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 2. and 42 notwithstanding s. 790.01, a person 18 years of age or older who 43 is in lawful possession of a handgun or other weapon may possess 44 such a handgun or weapon within the interior of a private 45 conveyance if the handgun or weapon is securely encased or 46 otherwise not readily accessible for immediate use. A person who 47 possesses a handgun or other weapon as authorized under this 48 subparagraph paragraph may not carry the handgun or weapon on 49 his or her person. 50 2.a.âA person may not store a handgun, whether loaded or 51 unloaded, in an unoccupied, unsecured private conveyance or 52 vessel unless the handgun is kept from ordinary observation and 53 view and secured with a device or mechanism that is securely 54 affixed to the private conveyance or vessel or kept locked 55 within a trunk, utility or glove box, or other locked container. 56 b.âFor purposes of this subparagraph, the term: 57 (I)ââPrivate conveyanceâ includes any motor vehicle as 58 defined in s. 790.251(2)(b) other than a public conveyance. 59 (II)ââUnsecuredâ means unlocked or otherwise left open to 60 entry. 61 (III)ââVesselâ has the same meaning as in s. 327.02. 62 c.âEach law enforcement agency shall engage in a 63 promotional campaign to educate the public and handgun owners 64 regarding the requirements of sub-subparagraph a. 65 d.âThe curricula of the firearms education, safety, and 66 training courses specified in s. 790.06(2)(h)1.-4. and 7. shall 67 contain instruction on the requirements of sub-subparagraph a. 68 Section 2.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 790.175, 69 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 70 790.175âTransfer or sale of firearms; required warnings; 71 penalties.â 72 (1)âUpon the retail commercial sale or retail transfer of 73 any firearm, the seller or transferor shall deliver a written 74 warning to the purchaser or transferee, which warning states, in 75 block letters not less than 1/4 inch in height: 76 77 âIT IS UNLAWFUL, AND PUNISHABLE BY IMPRISONMENT AND FINE, FOR 78 ANY ADULT TO STORE OR LEAVE A FIREARM IN ANY PLACE WITHIN THE 79 REACH OR EASY ACCESS OF A MINOR UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE OR TO 80 KNOWINGLY SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OR POSSESSION OF 81 A FIREARM TO A MINOR OR A PERSON OF UNSOUND MIND. A PERSON MAY 82 NOT STORE A HANDGUN, WHETHER LOADED OR UNLOADED, IN AN 83 UNOCCUPIED, UNSECURED PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL UNLESS THE 84 HANDGUN IS KEPT FROM ORDINARY OBSERVATION AND VIEW AND SECURED 85 WITH A DEVICE OR MECHANISM THAT IS SECURELY AFFIXED TO THE 86 PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL OR KEPT LOCKED WITHIN A TRUNK, 87 UTILITY OR GLOVE BOX, OR OTHER LOCKED CONTAINER.â 88 89 (2)âAny retail or wholesale store, shop, or sales outlet 90 which sells firearms must conspicuously post at each purchase 91 counter the following warning in block letters not less than 1 92 inch in height: 93 94 âIT IS UNLAWFUL TO STORE OR LEAVE A FIREARM IN ANY PLACE WITHIN 95 THE REACH OR EASY ACCESS OF A MINOR UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE OR TO 96 KNOWINGLY SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OR POSSESSION OF 97 A FIREARM TO A MINOR OR A PERSON OF UNSOUND MIND. A PERSON MAY 98 NOT STORE A HANDGUN, WHETHER LOADED OR UNLOADED, IN AN 99 UNOCCUPIED, UNSECURED PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL UNLESS THE 100 HANDGUN IS KEPT FROM ORDINARY OBSERVATION AND VIEW AND SECURED 101 WITH A DEVICE OR MECHANISM THAT IS SECURELY AFFIXED TO THE 102 PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL OR KEPT LOCKED WITHIN A TRUNK, 103 UTILITY OR GLOVE BOX, OR OTHER LOCKED CONTAINER.â 104 Section 3.âIt is the intent of the Legislature to provide 105 for the most efficient and effective deterrent to juvenile theft 106 of handguns from vessels and conveyances, tailored to local 107 conditions and resources. Therefore, the Legislature determines 108 and declares that this act fulfills an important state interest. 109 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 110 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.